Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-103.17 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In consultation with the Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education and the State Regents of Higher Education, the
HB3031 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Stat e Department of Education shall develop, implement, and maintain
a common course number system to be used by all public schools and
charter schools of this state for all courses taught at the
secondary level that are eligible for credit towards a high school
diploma, and are aligned with the Oklahoma Academic Standards.
Courses granted a nonstandard course waiver under subsection F of
this section shall also be assigned a common course number by the
State Department of Education.
B. The common course number system shall be designed to
describe course offerings and to provide a coherent means for
classifying courses across the state between school districts. At
the discretion of the State Department of Education, the
Classification of Secondary School Courses (CSSC) may be utilized as
a resource to create a general inventory of courses taught at the
secondary level. Vocational, academic, elective, apprenticeship,
and general courses offered for credit shall be included in the
common course number list and coding.
C. The State Department of Education shall design the common
course number system to provide school administrators, state and
local education stakeholders, and policy officials a resource to
convert course offerings, make comparisons of course offerings,
input information from transcripts, streamline master teaching
schedules, and to provide families usable communication tools for
graduation pathways in practical and efficient formats.
HB3031 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

D. The following six-digit numerical code composition is
recommended to the State Department of Education to identify each
course:
1. The first two digits identify the main program area subject
such as mathematics, English language arts, history, and others;
2. The second set of two digits represent the set of Oklahoma
Academic Standards within the main program area subject that align
with the course such as Algebra 1, Literature, Economics, and
others; and
3. The final two numbers may be used by school districts to
differentiate between class sections for the same course.
E. The common course number system required by this section
shall be developed no later than March 31, 2027, and shall be
implemented in public schools and public charter schools beginning
with the 2027-2028 school year.
F. A school may offer a course for credit that does not fully
align with the Oklahoma Academic Standards if the school submits a
Nonstandard Course Waiver to the waiver panel described in
subsection G of this section, and the waiver is approved.
G. 1. There shall be created a panel for the purposes of
reviewing and approving or disapproving Nonstandard Course Waivers
submitted by schools. The panel shall consist of seven (7) members
with knowledge of, experience with, or expertise in the Oklahoma

HB3031 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Acad emic Standards or curriculum adoption. The panel members shall
be designees selected and appointed by the following:
a. the Chancellor of the Regents of Higher Education,
b. the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives,
c. the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State
Senate,
d. the Superintendent of Public Instruction,
e. the Director of Career and Technology Education,
f. the Secretary of Education, and
g. the Oklahoma State School Boards Association (OSSBA).
The OSSBA's panel designee shall be a locally elected
school board member.
2. Initial appointments to the panel shall be made by March 31,
2027. Each designee appointed under this subsection shall serve at
the pleasure of the appointing authority, but shall not serve more
than six (6) consecutive years.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
03/04/2026 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.





HB3031 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.